Rhode Island, session 2025, SB942.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 44-5-12, 44-5-15, 44-5-16, 44-5-17, 44-5-26 and 44-5-30 of the
General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local Taxes" are hereby amended
to read as follows:
44-5-12. Assessment at full and fair cash value.
(a) All real property subject to taxation shall be assessed at its full and fair cash value, as
of December 31 in the year of the last update or revaluation, statistical revaluation or update thereto,
or at a uniform percentage thereof, not to exceed one hundred percent (100%), with such value to
be determined by the assessors in each town or city; provided, that. There shall be no adjustment
to an assessment because of an increase or decrease in such value as a result of market forces in
years when there is no revaluation, statistical revaluation or update thereto. It is further provided
that:
(1) Any residential property encumbered by a covenant recorded in the land records in
favor of a governmental unit or the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation
restricting either or both the rents that may be charged or the incomes of the occupants shall be
assessed and taxed in accordance with § 44-5-13.11;
(2) In assessing real estate that is classified as farmland, forest, or open space land in
accordance with chapter 27 of this title, the assessors shall consider no factors in determining the
full and fair cash value of the real estate other than those that relate to that use without regard to
neighborhood land use of a more intensive nature;

(3) Warwick. The city council of the city of Warwick is authorized to provide, by
ordinance, that the owner of any dwelling of one to three (3) family units in the city of Warwick
who makes any improvements or additions on his or her principal place of residence in the amount
up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), as may be determined by the tax assessor of the city of
Warwick, is exempt from reassessment of property taxes on the improvement or addition until the
next general citywide reevaluation of property values by the tax assessor. For the purposes of this
section, “residence” is defined as voting address. This exemption does not apply to any commercial
structure. The property owner shall supply all necessary plans to the building official for the
improvements or addition and shall pay all requisite building and other permitting fees as now are
required by law; and
(4) Central Falls. The city council of the city of Central Falls is authorized to provide, by
ordinance, that the owner of any dwelling of one to eight (8) units who makes any improvements
or additions to his or her residential or rental property in an amount not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000), as determined by the tax assessor of the city of Central Falls, is exempt
from reassessment of property taxes on the improvement or addition until the next general citywide
reevaluation of property values by the tax assessor. The property owner shall supply all necessary
plans to the building official for the improvements or additions and shall pay all requisite building
and other permitting fees as are now required by law.
(5) Tangible property shall be assessed according to the asset classification table as defined
in § 44-5-12.1. Renewable energy resources shall only be taxed as tangible property under § 44-5-
3(c) and the real property on which they are located shall not be reclassified, revalued, or reassessed
due to the presence of renewable energy resources, excepting only reclassification of farmland as
addressed in § 44-27-10.1. Subject to the aforementioned exception for farmland, all assessments
of real property with renewable energy resources thereon shall revert to the last assessed value
immediately prior to the renewable developer’s purchasing, leasing, securing an option to purchase
or lease, or otherwise acquiring any interest in the real property. However, notwithstanding the
above, but without any limitation on taxpayer rights under § 44-5-26, no municipality shall be liable
or otherwise responsible for any rebates, refunds, or any other reimbursements for taxes previously
collected for real property with renewable energy resources thereupon.
(6) Provided, however, that, for taxes levied after December 31, 2015, new construction on
development property is exempt from the assessment of taxes under this chapter at the full and fair
cash value of the improvements, as long as:
(i) An owner of development property files an affidavit claiming the exemption with the
local tax assessor by December 31 each year; and
LC002682/SUB A - Page 2 of 15

(ii) The assessor shall then determine if the real property on which new construction is
located is development property. If the real property is development property, the assessor shall
exempt the new construction located on that development property from the collection of taxes on
improvements, until such time as the real property no longer qualifies as development property, as
defined herein.
For the purposes of this section, “development property” means: (A) Real property on
which a single-family residential dwelling or residential condominium is situated and said single-
family residential dwelling or residential condominium unit is not occupied, has never been
occupied, is not under contract, and is on the market for sale; or (B) Improvements and/or
rehabilitation of single-family residential dwellings or residential condominiums that the owner of
such development property purchased out of a foreclosure sale, auction, or from a bank, and which
property is not occupied. Such property described in subsection (a)(6)(ii) of this section shall
continue to be taxed at the assessed value at the time of purchase until such time as such property
is sold or occupied and no longer qualifies as development property. As to residential
condominiums, this exemption shall not affect taxes on the common areas and facilities as set forth
in § 34-36-27. In no circumstance shall such designation as development property extend beyond
two (2) tax years and a qualification as a development property shall only apply to property that
applies for, or receives, construction permits after July 1, 2015. Further, the exemptions set forth
in this section shall not apply to land.
(b) Municipalities shall make available to every land owner whose property is taxed under
the provisions of this section a document that may be signed before a notary public containing
language to the effect that they are aware of the additional taxes imposed by the provisions of § 44-
5-39 in the event that they use land classified as farm, forest, or open space land for another purpose.
(c) Pursuant to the provisions of § 44-3-29.1, all wholesale and retail inventory subject to
taxation is assessed at its full and fair cash value, or at a uniform percentage of its value, not to
exceed one hundred percent (100%), for fiscal year 1999, by the assessors in each town and city.
Once the fiscal year 1999 value of the inventory has been assessed, this value shall not increase.
The phase-out rate schedule established in § 44-3-29.1(d) applies to this fixed value in each year
of the phase out.
44-5-15. Notice of assessors’ meetings — Notice by taxpayer of intent to bring in
account. Notice by taxpayer of intent to bring in account for tangible personal property.
(a) Before assessing any valuations of tangible personal property, the assessors of all the
cities and towns shall cause printed notices of the time and place of their respective meetings of the
requirement to file an account required by subsection (b) to be posted in four (4) public places in
LC002682/SUB A - Page 3 of 15

their respective city or town, for three (3) weeks next preceding the time of their meeting in the
month of December immediately preceding the tax year, and shall advertise in a newspaper with a
statewide circulation jointly, at least once a week for the same space of time. The cost of said
advertisement shall be shared equally among all of the cities and towns.
(b) The notices shall require that every person and body corporate liable to taxation of
tangible personal property shall be required to bring in to the assessors at the time they may
prescribe a true and exact account of all the ratable estate tangible personal property owned or
possessed by that person or body, describing and specifying the value of every parcel of the real
estate as of December 31 in the year of the last update or revaluation and personal estate tangible
personal property as of December 31 of immediately preceding the tax year, together with the
additional information that may be prescribed by the assessors relative to the ratable estate tangible
personal property as may be contained in any corporation or inheritance tax return filed with the
state by the person within the year preceding the date of assessment next prior to the bringing in of
the account.
(c) Said accounts must be filed with the assessor’s office in the city or town where the
property is located between January 2 and January 31 of each year, during regular business hours
(excluding weekends and holidays).
(d) If any person or body corporate liable to taxation files with the assessors, on or before
January 31 next following the date of assessment, a written notice of that person’s or that body’s
intention to bring in an account, the person or body corporate may bring in to the assessors the
account at any time between March 1 and before March 15 next following the date of assessment.
(e) The notice of intention to bring in an account is deemed to have been filed with the
assessors if the notice is sent to them by registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, postmarked
before 12:00 A.M. midnight of the last day on which the notice may be filed. The account is deemed
to be brought in to the assessors if the account is sent to them by registered or certified mail, postage
prepaid, postmarked before 12:00 A.M. midnight of the last day on which accounts may be brought
in pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(f) In case any person or body corporate fails to file any intention, that person or that body
is deemed to have waived that person’s or that body’s right to file the account.
(g) All matters contained within the account filing are available for review only by
assessment related personnel.
44-5-16. Oath to account brought in — Remedies after failure to bring in account —
Effect on proration.
(a) Every person bringing in any account shall make oath before some notary public or
LC002682/SUB A - Page 4 of 15

other person authorized to administer oaths in the place where the oath is administered that the
account by that person exhibited contains, to the best of his or her knowledge and belief, a true and
full account and valuation of all the ratable estate tangible personal property owned or possessed
by him or her; and whoever neglects or refuses to bring in the account, if overtaxed, shall have no
remedy therefor, except as provided in §§ 44-4-14, 44-4-15, 44-5-26 — 44-5-31, and 44-9-19 —
44-9-24. In case a taxpayer is, because of illness or absence from the state, unable to make the
required oath to his or her account within the time prescribed by law, the taxpayer may, in writing,
appoint an agent to make oath to his or her account within the time prescribed by the assessors, and
the agent shall at the time of making the oath append his or her written appointment to the account,
and for all purposes in connection with the account the taxpayer is deemed to have personally made
the oath.
(b) No taxpayer shall be denied a right of review by means of the procedure described in
this chapter: (1) of any assessment on his or her real tangible personal property by reason of any
claimed inadequacies, inaccuracies, or omissions in his or her listing of tangible personal property;
(2) nor in the case of his or her personal property by reason of any claimed inadequacies,
inaccuracies, or omissions in his or her listing of real property; (3) nor in the case of real or personal
property by reason of any claimed inadequacies, inaccuracies, or omissions, which are not
substantial, in his or her listing of real or personal property, respectively.
(c) Notwithstanding § 44-4-24, tangible personal property introduced into or removed from
any town or city during a calendar year shall be assessed as though the property was situated in the
city or town for the entire calendar year unless the taxpayer has filed an account as provided in this
section specifying the date on which the property was introduced or removed.
(d) Each city or town having a year of taxable ownership that measures length of ownership
over the calendar year beginning immediately after the date of assessment shall adjust its year of
taxable ownership so that it has a year of taxable ownership that measures length of ownership over
the calendar year ending on the date of assessment.
44-5-17. Assessment of property covered by account.
If any person brings in an account as provided in § 44-5-15 § 44-5-15(b), the assessors
shall nevertheless assess the person’s ratable estate tangible personal property at what they deem
its full and fair cash value, or a uniform percentage of its value as defined in § 44-5-12.
44-5-26. Petition in superior court for relief from assessment.
(a) Any person aggrieved on any ground whatsoever by any assessment of taxes against
him or her in any city or town, or any tenant or group of tenants, of real estate paying rent therefrom,
and under obligation to pay more than one-half (½) of the taxes thereon, may within ninety (90)
LC002682/SUB A - Page 5 of 15

days from the date the first tax payment is due, on or before November 15 of each year, but not less
than ninety (90) days after the first tax payment is due, file an appeal in the local office of tax
assessment; provided, if the person to whom a tax on real estate is assessed chooses to file an
appeal, the appeal filed by a tenant or group of tenants will be void. For the purposes of this section,
the tenant(s) has the burden of proving financial responsibility to pay more than one-half (½) of the
taxes. The assessor has forty-five (45) days until December 31 of that year to review the appeal
appeals, render a decision decisions and notify the taxpayer taxpayers of the decision decisions.
The taxpayer, if still aggrieved, may appeal the decision of the tax assessor to the local tax board
of review, after the decision by the tax assessor, or in the event that the assessor does not render a
decision by December 31, but not less than forty-five (45) days after the appeal was filed, or in the
event that the assessor does not render a decision, the taxpayer may appeal to the local tax board of
review; at the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period. Appeals provided; however, appeals to
the local tax board of review are to be filed not more than thirty (30) days after the assessor renders
a decision and notifies the taxpayer thereof, or if the assessor does not render a decision within
forty-five (45) days of the filing of the appeal, not more than ninety (90) days after the expiration
of the forty-five (45) day period by December 31, not later than January 31 of the next year. The
local tax board of review shall, within ninety (90) days of the filing of the appeal, hear the appeal
and render a decision within thirty (30) forty-five (45) days of the date that of the close of the
hearing was held. Provided, that a city or town may request and receive an extension from the
director of the Rhode Island department of revenue.
(b) Appeals to the local office of tax assessment are to be on an application form which has
been approved by the department of revenue in consultation with the Rhode Island League of Cities
and Towns. In the event of an appeal to the local tax board of review, the taxpayer or the local
office of tax assessment, upon at the request by the taxpayer, shall forward the application form to
the local tax board of review within the time period set forth in this section.
(c) Said application must include:
(1) The applicant’s opinion of value, fair market value, class and assessed value of said
property as of December 31 of the year of the last update or revaluation for real estate and as of
December 31 of the tax year for tangible personal property; and
(2) For income producing residential real estate of six (6) units or more, and commercial,
industrial or mixed-use real estate, fifty percent (50%) or more of which real estate was leased, or
was available to be leased, in an arm's length transaction during the prior year, a statement of rental
income and related expenses, if any, for said real estate. Said statement of income and expenses
shall cover the most recent twelve (12) month period preceding said December 31 date; provided,
LC002682/SUB A - Page 6 of 15

however, if such a statement of income and expenses is not yet available for said most recent twelve
(12) month period, the statement of income and expenses covering the next most recent twelve (12)
month period preceding said December 1 date shall be provided.
(d) Said application form shall provide that the applicant may file a single appeal for
multiple parcels of real estate if such parcels are contiguous and used as an aggregate site.
(e) Said application form shall also notify applicants that any global extension granted
pursuant to § 44-5-26(h) will be posted on the department of revenue, division of municipal finance
website.
(f) Failure to provide such statement of income and expenses shall be grounds for denial
of the appeal and such taxpayer shall not have the right to petition for relief in the superior court.
The application shall be in the following form:
STATE OF RHODE ISLAND
FISCAL YEAR _______ ____________________________
Name of City or Town
APPLICATION FOR APPEAL OF PROPERTY TAX
For appeals to the tax assessor, this form must be filed with the local office of tax assessment
within ninety (90) days from the date the first tax payment is due. For appeals to the local tax
board of review, this form must be filed with the local tax board of review not more than thirty
(30) days after the assessor renders a decision, or if the assessor does not render a decision within
forty-five (45) days of the filing of the appeal, not more than ninety (90) days after the expiration
of the forty-five (45) day period.
1. TAXPAYER INFORMATION:
A. Name(s) of Assessed Owner:______________________________________
B. Name(s) and Status of Applicant (if other than Assessed Owner):_________
____ Subsequent Owner (Acquired Title After December 31 on __________
20___________ )
____ Administrator/Executor ____ Lessee ____ Mortgagee ____ Other
Specify ____
C. Mailing Address and Telephone No.: __________ ( ) ____________
Address Tel. No.
D. Previous Assessed Value ___________ E. New Assessed Value _________
2. PROPERTY IDENTIFICATION: Complete using information as it appears on
tax bill.
A. Tax Bill Account No.: ___ Assessed Valuation ___ Annual Tax _________
LC002682/SUB A - Page 7 of 15

B. Location: _________________________ Description: ________________
No. Street Zip
Real Estate Parcel Identification: Map __ Block __ Parcel __ Type___
Tangible Personal
C. Date Property Acquired: Purchase Price: Total cost of any improvements__
What is the amount of fire insurance on building:
3. REASON(S) REDUCTION SOUGHT: Check reason(s) reduction is warranted
and briefly explain why it applies. Continue explanation on attachment if necessary.
Overvaluation. Incorrect Usage Classification.
Disproportionate Assessment. Other Specify:
Applicant’s Opinion of Fair Market Value Class Assessed Value
Value $ (as of December
31 in the year of
the last update or
revaluation for
real estate and
as of December 31
of the tax year
for personal estate;)
Explanation ______________________________________________________
________________________________________________________________
________________________________________________________________
Have you filed a true and exact account this year with the City Assessor as required by
law?
Comparable Properties that support your claim:
Address Sale Price Sales Date Property Type Assessed value
_________________________________________________________________
_________________________________________________________________
_________________________________________________________________
_________________________________________________________________
4. SIGNATURES;
SIGNATURE OF APPLICANT DATE
SIGNATURE OF AUTHORIZED AGENT DATE
( )
LC002682/SUB A - Page 8 of 15

_________________________________________________________________
Name of Preparer Address Tel. No.
TAXPAYER INFORMATION ABOUT APPEAL PROCEDURE
REASONS FOR AN APPEAL. It is the intent of the general assembly to ensure that all taxpayers
in Rhode Island are treated equitably. Ensuring that taxpayers are treated fairly begins where
cities and towns meet defined standards related to performing property values. All properties
should be assessed in a uniform manner, and properties of equal value should be assessed the
same.
TO DISPUTE YOUR VALUATION OR ASSESSMENT OR CORRECT ANY OTHER
BILLING PROBLEM OR ERROR THAT CAUSED YOUR TAX BILL TO BE HIGHER THAN
IT SHOULD BE, YOU MUST APPEAL WITHIN NINETY (90) DAYS FROM THE DATE THE
FIRST TAX PAYMENT IS DUE.
You may appeal your assessment if your property is: (1) OVERVALUED (assessed value
is more than the fair market value as of December 31 in the year of the last update or revaluation
for real estate and as of December 31 of the tax year for personal estate for any reason, including
clerical and data processing errors; (2) disproportionately assessed in comparison with other
properties; (3) classified incorrectly as residential, commercial, industrial or open space, farm or
forest; (4) illegal tax partially or fully exempt; (5) modified from its condition from the time of the
last update or revaluation.
WHO MAY FILE AN APPLICATION: You may file an application if you are (1) the
assessed or subsequent (acquiring title after December 31) owner of the property; (2) the owner’s
administrator or executor; (3) a tenant or group of tenants of real estate paying rent therefrom, and
under obligations to pay more than one-half (½) of the taxes thereon; (4) a person owning or having
an interest in or possession of the property; or (5) a mortgagee if the assessed owner has not applied.
In some cases, you must pay all or a portion of the tax before you can file.
WHEN AND WHERE APPLICATION MUST BE FILED. Your application must be filed
with the local office of tax assessment within NINETY (90) days from the date the first tax payment
is due. THESE DEADLINES CANNOT BE EXTENDED OR WAIVED BY THE ASSESSOR
FOR ANY REASON. IF YOUR APPLICATION IS NOT FILED ON TIME, YOU LOSE ALL
RIGHTS TO AN ABATEMENT AND THE ASSESSOR CANNOT BY LAW GRANT YOU
ONE. AN APPLICATION IS FILED WHEN RECEIVED BY THE ASSESSOR’S OFFICE.
PAYMENT OF TAX. Filing an application does not stay the collection of your taxes. In
some cases, you must pay the tax when due to appeal the assessors disposition of your application.
Failure to pay the tax assessed when due may also subject you to interest charges and collection
LC002682/SUB A - Page 9 of 15

action. To avoid any loss of rights or additional charges, you should pay the tax as assessed. If an
abatement is granted and you have already paid the entire year’s tax as abated, you will receive a
refund of any overpayment.
FILING AN ACCOUNT. Rhode Island General Laws Section 44-5-15 requires the annual
filing of a true and exact account of all ratable estate owned or possessed by every person and
corporate body. The time to file is between December 31, and January 31, of intention to submit
declaration by March 15. Failure to file a true and full account, within the prescribed time,
eliminates the right to appeal to the superior court, subject to the exceptions provided in Rhode
Island General Laws Section 44-5-26(b). No amended returns will be accepted after March 15th.
Such notice of your intention must be sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, postmark no later
than 12 o’clock midnight of the last day, January 31. No extensions beyond March 15th can be
granted. The form for filing such account may be obtained from the city or town assessor.
ASSESSOR’S DISPOSITION. Upon applying for a reduction in assessment, you may be
asked to provide the assessor with further written information about the property and to permit
them to inspect it. Failure to provide the information or permit an inspection within thirty (30) days
of the request may result in the loss of your appeal rights.
APPEAL. The assessor shall have forty-five (45) days to review the appeal, render a
decision and notify the taxpayer of the decision. The taxpayer, if still aggrieved, may appeal the
decision of the tax assessor to the local tax board of review, or in the event that the assessor does
not render a decision, the taxpayer may appeal to the local tax board of review at the expiration of
the forty-five (45) day period. Appeals to the local tax board of review shall be filed not more than
thirty (30) days after the assessor renders a decision and notifies the taxpayer, or if the assessor
does not render a decision within forty-five (45) days of the filing of the appeal, not more than
ninety (90) days after the expiration of the forty-five (45) day period.
____________________________________________________________________
DISPOSITION OF APPLICATION (ASSESSOR’S USE ONLY)
GRANTED Assessed Value______________
Date Sent______ Abated Value________________
Date Returned______ DENIED Adjusted Value______________
Assessed Tax________________
On-Site Inspection DEEMED DENIED Abated Tax_____________
Date Adjusted Tax________________
By_________________________________________
Date Voted/Deemed Denied Tax Board of Review
LC002682/SUB A - Page 10 of 15

Date Change Certificate No.
Any person still aggrieved on any ground whatsoever by an assessment of taxes against
him or her in any city or town may, within thirty (30) days of the tax board of review decision
notice, file a petition in the superior court for the county in which the city or town lies for relief
from the assessment, to which petition the assessors of taxes of the city or town in office at the time
the petition is filed shall be made parties respondent, and the clerk shall thereupon issue a citation
substantially in the following form:
THE STATE OF RHODE ISLAND.

To the sheriffs of several counties, or to their deputies, Greetings: We command you to
summon the assessors of taxes of the town of ________ : to wit, ________ of ________ (if to be
found in your precinct) to answer the complaint of ________ of ________ on the return day hereof
(said return day being the ___________ day of _____________________ A.D. 20___________)
in the superior court to be holden at the county courthouse in ________ as by petition filed in court
is fully set forth; and to show cause why said petition should not be granted. Hereof fail not, and
make true return of this writ with your doings thereon. Witness, the seal of our superior court, at
________ this ___________ day of _____________________ in the year ___________
__________, Clerk.
(c)(g) Provided, that in case the If a person has not filed an a required account for tangible
personal property, or filed an appeal first within with the local office of tax assessment and then
the local tax board of review, that person shall not have the benefit of the remedy provided in this
section and and/or in §§ 44-5-27 — 44-5-31, unless: (1) that person’s real estate has been assessed
at a value in excess of the value at which it was assessed on the last preceding assessment day,
whether then owned by that person or not, and has been assessed, if assessment has been made at
full and fair cash value, at a value in excess of its full and fair cash value, or, if assessment has
purportedly been made at a uniform percentage of full and fair cash value, at a percentage in excess
of the uniform percentage; or (2) the tax assessed is illegal in whole or in part; and that person’s
remedy is limited to a review of the assessment on the real estate or to relief with respect to the
illegal tax, as the case may be.
(h) The assessor for any city or town may request and receive from the director of the
department of revenue one or more ninety (90) day global extensions of time (i.e. extensions which
include all such appeals pending before the local tax board of review) to the December 31 date
referenced in subsection (a) of this section. All such extensions shall be in writing and posted on
the department of revenue, division of municipal finance website.
LC002682/SUB A - Page 11 of 15

(i) In the event that the local tax board of review does not hear a matter within ninety (90)
days of the filing of the appeal or, after the close of the hearing does not render a written decision
within forty-five (45) days of the date of the close of the hearing and there is no global extension
in effect, the city or town may request and receive from the director of the department of revenue
one or more extensions of time to either hear the matter and/or render a decision. The local board
of review shall notify the taxpayer in the event the director of the department of revenue grants a
city or town’s request for an extension to hear the taxpayer’s appeal and/or render a decision
thereon. Nothing herein shall prevent the local tax board of review and the taxpayer from mutually
agreeing to an extension of time for the matter to be heard and/or decision rendered.
(j) Any person still aggrieved on any ground whatsoever by an assessment of taxes against
him or her in any city or town may file, within thirty (30) days of the tax board of review’s written
decision and notice thereof, or in the event that the board has neither held a hearing nor issued a
decision within the above referenced time frames and has not sought and received an extension of
time from the director of the department of revenue to do so, a petition in a superior court for the
county in which the city or town lies for relief from the assessment. The assessor of taxes of the
city or town in office at the time the petition is filed shall be named as a respondent in said action.
(k) The petition and accompanying summons/citation shall be served upon the assessors in
the manner set forth in rule 4 of the Rhode Island superior court rules of civil procedure governing
service of process.
(l) A plaintiff may amend a petition filed in the superior court seeking relief from a tax
assessment so as to include an appeal of the assessment of the same real estate for tax years
subsequent to the tax year which is the subject of said petition but prior to the tax year covered by
the next revaluation, statistical revaluation or update. Such amendment must be filed on or before
November 15 of the tax year for which the relief is being sought. Said taxpayer shall not be required
to first file an appeal with either the local tax assessor or local tax board for such tax years prior to
amending said petition.
(m) A petitioner may file a single petition for multiple parcels of real estate if those parcels
are contiguous and used as an aggregate site.
44-5-30. Judgment on petition where taxpayer has filed account. Judgment on
petition.
(a) If the taxpayer has given in an account, and if on On the trial of the petition, either with
or without a jury, it appears that the taxpayer’s real estate, tangible personal property, or intangible
personal property has been assessed in excess of the provisions of § 44-5-12 or if it appears that the
tax assessed is illegal in whole or in part, the court shall give judgment that the sum by which the
LC002682/SUB A - Page 12 of 15

taxpayer has been so overtaxed, or illegally taxed, with his or her costs, be deducted from his or
her tax; but if the taxpayer’s tax be paid, whether before or after the filing of the petition, then the
court shall give judgment for the petitioner for the sum by which he or she has been so overtaxed,
or illegally taxed, plus the amount of any penalty paid on the tax, with interest from the date on
which the tax and penalty were paid and costs, which judgment shall be paid to the petitioner by
the city or town treasurer out of the treasury.
(b) If, however , on the trial of the petition related to tangible personal property and/or real
estate, either with or without a jury, it appears that as it relates to tangible personal property the
taxpayer has failed to file a required account or has fraudulently concealed or omitted any property
information from his or her account, or if it appears that the assessors have not assessed either the
taxpayer's tangible personal property or real estate either the taxpayer’s real estate or his or her
tangible personal property or his or her intangible personal property at a value in excess of the
provisions of § 44-5-12, and that the taxpayer has not been illegally taxed, the assessors shall have
judgment and execution for their costs.
SECTION 2. Section 44-5-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby repealed.
44-5-31. Judgment where taxpayer has not filed account.
If the taxpayer has not filed an account, and if on the trial of the petition, either with or
without a jury, it appears:
(1) That his or her real estate has been assessed at a value in excess of the value at which
it was assessed on the last preceding assessment day, whether then owned by him or her or not, and
that the real estate has been assessed, if assessment has been made a full and fair cash value, at a
value in excess of its full and fair cash value, or, if assessment has purportedly been made at a
uniform percentage of full and fair cash value, at a percentage in excess of the uniform percentage;
or
(2) That the tax assessed is illegal in whole or in part, the court shall give judgment that
the sum by which the taxpayer has been so overtaxed or illegally taxed, with his or her costs, be
deducted from his or her tax; but if the taxpayer’s tax is paid, whether before or after the filing of
the petition, then the court shall give judgment for the petitioner for the sum by which he or she
has been so overtaxed, or illegally taxed, plus the amount of any penalty paid on the tax, with
interest from the date on which the tax and penalty were paid, and costs, which judgment shall be
paid to the petitioner by the city or town treasurer out of the treasury. Otherwise, the assessors shall
have judgment and execution for their costs.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage; provided, however, the provisions
LC002682/SUB A - Page 13 of 15

thereof shall apply to assessment dates on and after December 31, 2025. This act shall not apply
retroactively to appeals of prior assessments whether pending or filed after enactment.
========
LC002682/SUB A
========
LC002682/SUB A - Page 14 of 15